New York, session 2025-2026, S5738.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 5-216 of the election law is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 2. a. If the applicant be a person who does not speak the English 4 language, [he] the applicant may be assisted by a relative who can 5 interpret for [him] the applicant. If the applicant registers with this 6 assistance the board shall put in the remarks space of the registration 7 forms the name and address, and the relationship, of the person so doing 8 the interpreting and the interpreter shall sign [his] the interpreter's 9 name in the remarks space. 10 b. In any city having a population of one million or more people, 11 which contains any county that has a population comprised of five 12 percent or more of people whose first language is Russian within such 13 county, the board of elections shall provide Russian interpreters at 14 polling locations in those election districts within each such county in 15 the city having a population comprised of five percent or more people 16 whose first language is Russian. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 18 elections conducted on or after such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03891-01-5